District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as the “Modification Nos. 2 and 3 to Contract NFPHC-NUR-
23-C-00039 between Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation and Aya Healthcare, Inc.
Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and
notwithstanding the requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform
Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02),
the Council approves Modification Nos. 2 and 3 to Contract NFPHC-NUR-23-C-00039
between the Not-for-Profit Hospital Corporation and Aya Healthcare, Inc.
to provide supplemental staffing in nursing, and authorizes payments in the not-to-exceed
amounts of $5.7 million in option year one and $1.2 million in option year 2 for the
services received and to be received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as
the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures
Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-
301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for
no longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of
Columbia in section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a))
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2